Louisiana, session 2026, HB604.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The sum of Ten Thousand Eight Hundred Thirty-Three and No/100
($10,833.00) Dollars is hereby payable out of the State General Fund (Direct) for Fiscal Year
2025-2026 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Sulochana Dhungana Nepal,
individually and on behalf of her deceased husband, Binod Nepal versus Tiger Pointe
Owner, LLC. Embassy Apartments, LLC, Progressive Security Insurance Company and
Kendall J. Juneau", signed on July 28, 2025, between the state of Louisiana, through the
Department of Transportation and Development, and Sulochana Dhungana Nepal,
individually and on behalf of her deceased husband, Binod Nepal, bearing number 699,332,
Section 25 on the docket of the Nineteenth Judicial District, parish of East Baton Rouge,
state of Louisiana.
Page 1 of 2

HLS 26RS-1096 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 604
Section 2. The judgment may only be paid from this appropriation if it is final and
shall be paid as to principal, interest, court costs, and expert witness fees as awarded in the
judgment. If the provisions of the judgment conflict with the provisions of this Act, the
provisions of the judgment shall be controlling. Any other provision of this Act not in
conflict with the provisions of the judgment shall control. Payment shall be made only after
presentation to the state treasurer of documentation required by the state treasurer. Further,
the judgment shall be deemed to have been paid on the effective date of this Act, and interest
shall cease to run as of that date.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.